North Carolina statutes. Chapter 142. State Debt.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 142-1.
How bonds executed; interest coupons attached; where payable; not to be sold at less than par.

All bonds or certificates of debt of the State shall be signed by the Governor, and countersigned by the State Treasurer, and sealed with the great seal of the State, and shall be made payable to bearer unless registered as hereinafter provided. The principal shall be made payable by the State at a day named in the bonds or certificates. Interest coupons shall be attached to the bonds or certificates unless they be bonds or certificates registered as to both principal and interest, and the bonds, certificates and coupons shall be made payable at such banks or trust companies within or without the State as shall be designated by the State Treasurer, or at the office of the State Treasurer in Raleigh. Any bank or trust company serving as a paying agent may be paid such reasonable fees and charges for such services as shall be agreed upon by and between such bank or trust company and the State Treasurer. No original bond or certificate of debt of the State shall be sold for a sum less than the par value thereof, nor shall any such bond or certificate, issued in lieu of a transferred bond or certificate, be payable elsewhere than may be the original, except by the consent of the holder it may be made payable at the State treasury.

History.

1848, c. 89, s. 22; 1852, c. 9; c. 10, s. 10; R.C., c. 90, s. 3; Code, s. 3563; Rev., s. 5020; C.S., s. 7401; Ex. Sess. 1921, c. 66, ss. 1, 2; 1977, c. 405.

Two-Thirds Bonds Act of 2008.

Session Laws
2008-107, s. 27.9, as amended by Session Laws
2008-118, s. 2.7 (c) and (d), as amended by Session Laws
2009-209, s. 1(a) through (f), provides: “(a) Short Title. — This section may be cited as the ‘Two-Thirds Bonds Act of 2008.’

“(b) Findings and Determinations. — It is the intent and purpose of the General Assembly by this section to provide for the issuance of general obligation bonds or notes of the State in order to provide funds for the cost of State capital facilities.

“(c) Definitions. — The following definitions apply in this section unless the context otherwise requires:

“(1) Bonds. — Bonds issued under this section.

“(2) Cost. — The term includes all of the following:

“a. The cost of constructing, reconstructing, renovating, repairing, enlarging, acquiring, and improving State capital facilities, including the acquisition of land, rights-of-way, easements, franchises, equipment, machinery, furnishings, and other interests in real or personal property acquired or used in connection with a State capital facility.

“b. The cost of engineering, architectural, and other consulting services as may be required.

“c. Administrative expenses and charges.

“d. The cost of providing personnel to ensure effective project management.

“e. The cost of bond insurance, investment contracts, credit enhancement and liquidity facilities, interest-rate swap agreements or other derivative products, financial and legal consultants and related costs of bond and note issuance, to the extent and as determined by the State Treasurer.

“f. Finance charges, reserves for debt service, and other types of reserves required pursuant to the terms of any bond or note or related documents, interest before and during construction or acquisition of a State capital facility and, if considered advisable by the State Treasurer, for a period not exceeding two years after the estimated date of completion of construction or acquisition.

“g. The cost of bond insurance, investment contracts, credit enhancement facilities and liquidity facilities, interest-rate swap agreements or other derivative products, financial and legal consultants, and related costs of the incurrence or issuance of any bond or note.

“h. The cost of reimbursing the State for any payments made for any cost described in this subdivision.

“i. Any other costs and expenses necessary or incidental to the purposes of this section.

“(3) Credit facility. — An agreement entered into by the State Treasurer on behalf of the State with a bank, savings and loan association or other banking institution, an insurance company, reinsurance company, surety company or other insurance institution, a corporation, investment banking firm or other investment institution, or any financial institution or other similar provider of a credit facility, which provider may be located within or without the United States, such agreement providing for prompt payment of all or any part of the principal or purchase price (whether at maturity, presentment or tender for purchase, redemption or acceleration), redemption premium, if any, and interest on any bonds or notes payable on demand or tender by the owner, in consideration of the State agreeing to repay the provider of the credit facility in accordance with the terms and provisions of such agreement.

“(4) Notes. — Notes issued under this section.

“(5) Par formula. — A provision or formula adopted by the State to provide for the adjustment, from time to time, of the interest rate or rates borne by any bonds or notes, including:

“a. A provision providing for such adjustment so that the purchase price of such bonds or notes in the open market would be as close to par as possible.

“b. A provision providing for such adjustment based upon a percentage or percentages of a prime rate or base rate, which percentage or percentages may vary or be applied for different periods of time.

“c. Such other provision as the State Treasurer may determine to be consistent with this act and will not materially and adversely affect the financial position of the State and the marketing of bonds or notes at a reasonable interest cost to the State.

“(6) State. — The State of North Carolina, including any State agency.

“(7) State agency. — Any agency, institution, board, commission, bureau, council, department, division, officer, or employee of the State. The term does not include counties, municipal corporations, political subdivisions, local boards of education, or other local public bodies.

“(d) Authorization of Bonds and Notes. — The State Treasurer is authorized, by and with the consent of the Council of State, to issue and sell at one time or from time to time in the biennium ending June 30, 2011, general obligation bonds of the State to be designated ‘State of North Carolina General Obligation Bonds,’ with any additional designations as may be determined, or notes of the State, in the aggregate principal amount of four hundred eighty-seven million seven hundred thousand dollars ($487,700,000), this amount being not in excess of two-thirds of the amount by which the State’s outstanding indebtedness will be reduced during the biennium ending June 30, 2009, for the purpose of providing funds, with any other available funds, for the purposes authorized by this section.

“(e) Uses of Bond and Note Proceeds. — The proceeds of bonds and notes shall be used for financing the cost of State capital facilities as provided in this section. Any additional moneys which may be received by grant from the United States of America or any agency or department thereof or from any other source to aid in financing the cost of any State capital facilities authorized by this section may be placed by the State Treasurer in a separate fund or funds and shall be disbursed, to the extent permitted by the terms of the grant, without regard to any limitations imposed by this section.

“The proceeds of bonds and notes may be used with any other moneys made available by the General Assembly for the cost of State capital facilities, including the proceeds of any other State bond issues, whether heretofore made available or which may be made available at the session of the General Assembly at which this section is ratified or any subsequent sessions. The proceeds of bonds and notes shall be expended and disbursed under the direction and supervision of the Director of the Budget. The funds provided by this section shall be disbursed for the purposes provided in this section upon warrants drawn on the State Treasurer by the State Controller, which warrants shall not be drawn until requisition has been approved by the Director of the Budget and which requisition shall be approved only after full compliance with the State Budget Act, Chapter 143C of the General Statutes.

“The Office of State Budget and Management shall provide semiannual reports to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Capital Improvements, the Chairs of the Senate and House of Representatives Appropriation Committees, and the Fiscal Research Division on the expenditure of moneys authorized by this section. The reports shall continue until the completion of the projects provided for in this section.

“(f) Allocation of Proceeds. — The proceeds of bonds and notes shall be allocated and expended as provided in this subsection:

“(1) A maximum aggregate principal amount of ninety-nine million fifty-four thousand five hundred eighty-four dollars ($99,054,584) to finance the capital facility costs of the Green Square Project, Department of Environment and Natural Resources. The projected allocation may be increased to reflect the availability of other funds, including contingency funds, income earned on the investment of bond and note proceeds, and the proceeds of any grants.

“(2) A maximum aggregate principal amount of two hundred twenty-three million dollars ($223,000,000) to finance the capital facility costs of the Biomedical Research Imaging Center at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill. The project allocation may be increased to reflect the availability of other funds, including contingency funds, income earned on the investment of bond and note proceeds, and the proceeds of any grants.

“(3) A maximum aggregate principal amount of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) to finance the capital facility costs of repairing and renovating State facilities and related infrastructure, to be allocated by the General Assembly.

“(4) An amount the Director of the Budget determines is not required for projects listed in subdivisions (1), (2), and (3) of this subsection to finance a portion of those capital projects that have been approved by the General Assembly for financing with the proceeds of special indebtedness as hereinafter described.

“(f1) The projects financed with the proceeds of bonds allocated as provided in Section 27.9(f)(4) of this act may include, but are not limited to, the following projects:

“(1) Davis Arena renovation and expansion at The Western North Carolina Agricultural Center.

“(2) School of Education building at Elizabeth City State University.

“(3) General Classroom building at North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University.

“(4) Nursing Building at North Carolina Central University.

“(5) Energy Production Infrastructure Center at the University of North Carolina at Charlotte.

“(6) Educational Building at Appalachian State University.

“(7) Renovation of Rhoades Hall at the University of North Carolina at Asheville.

“(f2) The State, upon the direction of the Director of the Budget, may finance with the proceeds of bonds authorized pursuant to this act the costs of any capital project approved for financing with special indebtedness, provided that the bonds must be issued in the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2011. The State, upon the direction of the Director of the Budget, may finance with the proceeds of special indebtedness the costs of any capital project approved for financing with proceeds of bonds authorized pursuant to this act. If the financing is to be provided by special indebtedness, then such indebtedness may be issued or incurred during or beyond the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2011. The amount of financing for a project from special indebtedness and the proceeds of two-thirds bonds issued pursuant to this act shall not exceed the amount set forth in the legislation that authorizes the project.

“(f3) As used in this act, projects approved for financing with special indebtedness, as authorized by Article 9 of Chapter 142 of the General Statutes, means projects authorized pursuant to this act or to Session Laws 2003-314, 2004-126, 2004-179, 2005-276, 2006-66, 2006-231, 2007-323, and 2008-107.

“(f4) The Office of State Budget and Management shall report to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations no more than 30 days after issuing bonds or notes pursuant to Section 27.9 of this act or special indebtedness. Each report shall include the project name, the form of indebtedness, terms of the sale, the authorizing legislation, and justification for the form of debt selected. This subsection expires on June 30, 2011.

“(g) Issuance of bonds and notes. —

“(1) Terms and conditions. — Bonds or notes may bear a date or dates, may be serial or term bonds or notes, or any combination thereof, may mature in such amounts and at such time or times, not exceeding 40 years from their date or dates, may be payable at such place or places, either within or without the United States of America, in such coin or currency of the United States of America as at the time of payment is legal tender for payment of public and private debts, may bear interest at such rate or rates, which may vary from time to time, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the State or otherwise as may be provided by the State, at such price or prices, including a price less than or greater than the face amount of the bonds or notes, and under such terms and conditions, all as may be determined by the State Treasurer, by and with the consent of the Council of State.

“(2) Signatures; form and denomination; registration. — Bonds or notes may be issued in certificated or uncertificated form. If issued in certificated form, bonds or notes shall be signed on behalf of the State by the Governor or shall bear the Governor’s facsimile signature, shall be signed by the State Treasurer or shall bear the State Treasurer’s facsimile signature, and shall bear the Great Seal of the State, or a facsimile of the Seal shall be impressed or imprinted thereon. If bonds or notes bear the facsimile signatures of the Governor and the State Treasurer, the bonds or notes shall also bear a manual signature which may be that of a bond registrar, trustee, paying agent or designated assistant of the State Treasurer. Should any officer whose signature or facsimile signature appears on bonds or notes cease to be such officer before the delivery of the bonds or notes, the signature or facsimile signature shall nevertheless have the same validity for all purposes as if the officer had remained in office until delivery. Bonds or notes may bear the facsimile signatures of persons who at the actual time of the execution of the bonds or notes shall be the proper officers to sign any bond or note, although at the date of the bond or note such persons may not have been such officers. The form and denomination of bonds or notes, including the provisions with respect to registration of the bonds or notes and any system for their registration, shall be as the State Treasurer may determine in conformity with this section.

“(3) Manner of sale; expenses. — Subject to the approval by the Council of State as to the manner in which bonds or notes shall be offered for sale, whether at public or private sale, whether within or without the United States, and whether by publishing notices in certain newspapers and financial journals, mailing notices, inviting bids by correspondence, negotiating contracts of purchase or otherwise, the State Treasurer is authorized to sell bonds or notes at one time or from time to time at any rates of interest, which may vary from time to time, and at any prices, including a price less than or greater than the face amount of the bonds or notes, as the State Treasurer may determine. All expenses incurred in the preparation, sale, and issuance of bonds or notes shall be paid by the State Treasurer from the proceeds of bonds or notes or other available moneys.

“(4) Notes; repayment. —

“a. By and with the consent of the Council of State, the State Treasurer is hereby authorized to borrow money and to execute and issue notes of the State for the same, but only in the following circumstances and under the following conditions:

“1. For anticipating the sale of bonds, the issuance of which the Council of State has approved, if the State Treasurer considers it advisable to postpone the issuance of the bonds;

“2. For the payment of interest on or any installment of principal of any bonds then outstanding, if there are not sufficient funds in the State treasury with which to pay the interest or installment of principal as they respectively become due;

“3. For the renewal of any loan evidenced by notes authorized in this section;

“4. For the purposes authorized in this section; and

“5. For refunding bonds or notes as authorized in this section.

“b. Funds derived from the sale of bonds or notes may be used in the payment of any bond anticipation notes issued under this section. Funds provided by the General Assembly for the payment of interest on or principal of bonds shall be used in paying the interest on or principal of any notes and any renewals thereof, the proceeds of which shall have been used in paying interest on or principal of the bonds.

“(5) Refunding bonds and notes. — By and with the consent of the Council of State, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue and sell refunding bonds and notes pursuant to the provisions of the State Refunding Bond Act for the purpose of refunding bonds or notes issued pursuant to this section. The refunding bonds and notes may be combined with any other issues of State bonds and notes similarly secured. Refunding bonds or notes may be issued at any time prior to the final maturity of the debt obligation to be refunded. The proceeds from the sale of any refunding bonds or notes shall be applied to the immediate payment and retirement of the bonds or notes being refunded or, if not required for the immediate payment of the bonds or notes being refunded, the proceeds shall be deposited in trust to provide for the payment and retirement of the bonds or notes being refunded and to pay any expenses incurred in connection with the refunding. Money in a trust fund may be invested in (i) direct obligations of the United States government, (ii) obligations the principal of and interest on which are guaranteed by the United States government, (iii) obligations of any agency or instrumentality of the United States government if the timely payment of principal and interest on the obligations is unconditionally guaranteed by the United States government or (iv) certificates of deposit issued by a bank or trust company located in the State if the certificates are secured by a pledge of any of the obligations described in (i), (ii), or (iii) above having an aggregate market value, exclusive of accrued interest, equal at least to the principal amount of the certificates so secured. This section does not limit the duration of any deposit in trust for the retirement of bonds or notes being refunded but that have not matured and are not presently redeemable, or if presently redeemable, have not been called for redemption.

“(6) Tax exemption. — Bonds and notes shall at all times be free from taxation by the State or any political subdivision or any of their agencies, excepting estate, inheritance or gift taxes, income taxes on the gain from the transfer of bonds or notes, and franchise taxes. The interest on bonds or notes is not subject to taxation as income.

“(7) Investment eligibility. — Bonds and notes are securities in which all of the following may invest, including capital in their control or belonging to them: public officers, agencies, and public bodies of the State and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies, investment companies, banks, savings banks, savings and loan associations, credit unions, pension or retirement funds, other financial institutions engaged in business in the State, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries. Bonds and notes are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any officer or agency of the State or political subdivision of the State for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds, notes, or obligations of the State or any political subdivision is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

“(8) Faith and credit. — The faith and credit and taxing power of the State are hereby pledged for the payment of the principal of and the interest on bonds and notes. The State expressly reserves the right to amend any provision of this section to the extent it does not impair any contractual right of a bond owner.

“(9) Other agreements. — The State Treasurer may authorize, execute, obtain, or otherwise provide for bond insurance, investment contracts, credit and liquidity facilities, interest-rate swap agreements and other derivative products, and any other related instruments and matters the State Treasurer determines are desirable in connection with issuance, incurrence, carrying, or securing of bonds or notes. The State Treasurer is authorized to employ and designate any financial consultants, underwriters, and bond attorneys to be associated with any bond or note issue under this section as the State Treasurer considers necessary.

“(h) Variable Rate Demand Bonds and Notes. — In fixing the details of bonds and notes, the State Treasurer may provide that any of the bonds or notes may:

“(1) Be made payable from time to time on demand or tender for purchase by the owner, if a credit facility supports the bonds or notes, unless the State Treasurer specifically determines that a credit facility is not required upon a finding and determination by the State Treasurer that the absence of a credit facility will not materially and adversely affect the financial position of the State and the marketing of the bonds or notes at a reasonable interest cost to the State;

“(2) Be additionally supported by a credit facility;

“(3) Be made subject to redemption or a mandatory tender for purchase prior to maturity;

“(4) Bear interest at a rate or rates that may vary for any period of time, as may be provided in the proceedings providing for the issuance of the bonds or notes, including, without limitation, such variations as may be permitted pursuant to a par formula; and

“(5) Be made the subject of a remarketing agreement whereby an attempt is made to remarket bonds or notes to new purchasers prior to their presentment for payment to the provider of the credit facility or to the State.

“If the aggregate principal amount payable by the State under a credit facility is in excess of the aggregate principal amount of bonds or notes secured by the credit facility, whether as a result of the inclusion in the credit facility of a provision for the payment of interest for a limited period of time or the payment of a redemption premium or for any other reason, then the amount of authorized but unissued bonds or notes during the term of such credit facility shall not be less than the amount of such excess, unless the payment of such excess is otherwise provided for by agreement of the State executed by the State Treasurer.

“(i) Interpretation of Section. —

“(1) Additional method. — The foregoing sections of this section shall be deemed to provide an additional and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized under it and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws, and shall not be regarded as in derogation of any powers now existing.

“(2) Statutory references. — References in this section to specific sections or Chapters of the General Statutes or to specific acts are intended to be references to such sections, Chapters, or acts as they may be amended from time to time by the General Assembly.

“(3) Broad construction. — This section, being necessary for the health and welfare of the people of the State, shall be broadly construed to effect the purposes thereof.

“(4) Inconsistent provisions. — Insofar as the provisions of this section are inconsistent with the provisions of any general, special, or local laws, or parts thereof, the provisions of this section shall be controlling.

“(5) Severability. — If any provision of this section or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the section which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this section are declared to be severable.

“(j) Effective Date. — This section is effective when it becomes law [July 16, 2008].”

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws
2008-107, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2008’.”

Session Laws
2008-107, s. 30.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2008-2009 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2008-2009 fiscal year.”

Session Laws
2008-107, s. 30.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2015-280, s. 1(a)-(e), provides: “

SECTION 1(a).

Short Title. — This section shall be known as the ‘Connect NC Bond Act of 2015.’

“

SECTION 1(b).

Purpose. — It is the intent of the General Assembly by this act to provide, subject to a vote of the qualified voters of the State, for the issuance of two billion dollars ($2,000,000,000) general obligation bonds of the State for the purpose of providing funds, with any other available funds, to update the State’s public facilities for the 21st century, including, without limitation, construction, repair, renovation, and furnishing of new facilities in order to (i) enhance other economic development efforts of the State and (ii) attract new and assist existing industry, business, technology, and tourism for the benefit of the State and its citizenry.

“

SECTION 1(c).

Findings. — The General Assembly finds the following:

“(1) The University of North Carolina is in need of new and renovated facilities to educate and prepare students; especially in the areas of science, technology, engineering, and math; to conduct research; and to recruit, retain, and prepare researchers and faculty for the 21st century for the purpose of enhancing the economic attractiveness of the State.

“(2) The North Carolina Community College System is in need of new and renovated facilities to educate and prepare students and workers for the 21st century for the purpose of enhancing the economic attractiveness of the State.

“(3) Parks and public facilities that are accessible to children with disabilities and veterans with disabilities are essential for the 21st century to attract new and assist existing industry, business, technology, and tourism for the benefit of the State and its citizenry.

“(4) Clean water and sewer systems are essential for the 21st century to attract new and assist existing industry, business, technology, and tourism for the benefit of the State and its citizenry.

“(5) Modern National Guard facilities attract new defense industry companies and suppliers.

“(6) New facilities for agriculture will assist current agricultural endeavors in the State and will attract bioscience and other related industries, thereby benefitting the State’s economic development.

“(7) New and renovated State parks and attractions are vital components of tourism in the State, thereby benefitting the State’s economic development.

“(8) Adequate public safety is essential for the public welfare, for orderly economic development, and to attract new and assist existing industry, business, technology, and tourism for the benefit of the State and its citizenry.

“(9) State facilities need routine repair and renovations in order for the facilities to be up-to-date for the 21st century to attract new and assist existing industry, business, technology, and tourism for the benefit of the State and its citizenry.

“(10) The components set forth above are all interrelated and united and comprise a single plan for updating the State’s infrastructure for the 21st century and for providing the State with necessary economic development tools to attract new and assist existing industry, business, technology, and tourism for the benefit of the State and its citizenry.

“

SECTION 1(d).

Definitions. — Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions apply in this section:

“(1) Bonds. — Bonds issued under this section.

“(2) Cost. — Without intending thereby to limit or restrict any proper definition of this term in financing the cost of facilities or purposes authorized by this section, any of the following:

“a. The cost of constructing, reconstructing, enlarging, acquiring, and improving facilities and acquiring equipment and land therefor.

“b. The cost of engineering, architectural, and other consulting services as may be required.

“c. Administrative expenses and charges. Nothing in this section shall permit use of bond funds to pay salaries or fees for bond administration; such salaries and fees shall come from funds appropriated by the General Assembly.

“d. Finance charges and interest prior to and during construction and, if deemed advisable by the State Treasurer, for a period not exceeding three years after the estimated date of completion of construction.

“e. The cost of bond insurance, investment contracts, credit enhancement and liquidity facilities, interest-rate swap agreements or other derivative products, financial and legal consultants, and related costs of bond and note issuance, to the extent and as determined by the State Treasurer.

“f. The cost of reimbursing the State for any payments made for any cost described in this subdivision.

“g. Any other costs and expenses necessary or incidental to the purposes of this section.

“Allocations in this section of proceeds of bonds to the costs of a project or undertaking in each case may include allocations to pay the costs set forth in sub-subdivisions c. through g. of this subdivision in connection with the issuance of bonds for the project or undertaking.

“(3) Credit facility agreement. — An agreement entered into by the State Treasurer on behalf of the State with a bank, savings and loan association, or other banking institution; an insurance company, reinsurance company, surety company, or other insurance institution; a corporation, investment banking firm, or other investment institution; or any financial institution or other similar provider of a credit facility agreement, which provider may be located within or without the United States of America, such agreement providing for prompt payment of all or any part of the principal or purchase price (whether at maturity, presentment or tender for purchase, redemption, or acceleration), redemption premium, if any, and interest on any bonds or notes payable on demand or tender by the owner, in consideration of the State agreeing to repay the provider of the credit facility agreement in accordance with the terms and provisions of such agreement.

“(4) Notes. — Notes issued under this section.

“(5) Par formula. — Any provision or formula adopted by the State to provide for the adjustment, from time to time, of the interest rate or rates borne by any bonds or notes, including the following:

“a. A provision providing for such adjustment so that the purchase price of such bonds or notes in the open market would be as close to par as possible;

“b. A provision providing for such adjustment based upon a percentage or percentages of a LIBOR rate, a prime rate, or base rate, which percentage or percentages may vary or be applied for different periods of time; or

“c. Such other provision as the State Treasurer may determine to be consistent with this section and will not materially and adversely affect the financial position of the State and the marketing of bonds or notes at a reasonable interest cost to the State.

“(6) State. — The State of North Carolina.

“

SECTION 1(e).

Authorization of Bonds and Notes. — Subject to a favorable vote of a majority of the qualified voters of the State who vote on the question of issuing public improvement bonds in the election called and held as provided in this section, the State Treasurer is hereby authorized, by and with the consent of the Council of State, to issue and sell, at one time or from time to time, general obligation bonds of the State to be designated “State of North Carolina Public Improvement Bonds,” with any additional designations as may be determined to indicate the issuance of bonds from time to time, or notes of the State as provided in this section, in an aggregate principal amount not exceeding two billion dollars ($2,000,000,000) for the purpose of providing funds, with any other available funds, for the purposes authorized in this section.”

Session Laws 2015-280, s. 1(f), as amended by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 40.9(d), pertains to: Use of Public Improvement Bond and Note Proceeds. — Allocated for use on buildings and projects for various parts of the University of North Carolina, North Carolina community colleges, local parks, National Guard, State Parks and attractions, and public safety.

Session Laws
2015-280, ss. 1(g)-(
l
), provides: “

SECTION 1(g).

Allocation and Tracking of Proceeds. —

“(1) Public improvement bonds. — The proceeds of public improvement bonds and notes, including premium thereon, if any, except the proceeds of bonds the issuance of which has been anticipated by bond anticipation notes or the proceeds of refunding bonds or notes, shall be placed by the State Treasurer in a special fund to be designated “Public Improvement Bonds Fund,” which may include such appropriate special accounts therein as may be determined by the State Treasurer and shall be disbursed as provided in this section. Monies in the Public Improvement Bonds Fund shall be allocated and expended as provided in this section.

“Any additional monies that may be received by means of a grant or grants from the United States of America or any agency or department thereof or from any other source for deposit to the Public Improvement Bonds Fund may be placed in the Public Improvement Bonds Fund or in a separate account or fund and shall be disbursed, to the extent permitted by the terms of the grant or grants, without regard to any limitations imposed by this section.

“Monies in the Public Improvement Bonds Fund or any separate account established under this section may be invested from time to time by the State Treasurer in the same manner permitted for investment of monies belonging to the State or held in the State treasury, except with respect to grant money to the extent otherwise directed by the terms of the grant. Investment earnings, except investment earnings with respect to grant monies to the extent otherwise directed or restricted by the terms of the grant, may be (i) credited to the Public Improvement Bonds Fund, (ii) used to pay debt service on the bonds authorized by this section, (iii) used to satisfy compliance with applicable requirements of the federal tax law, or (iv) transferred to the General Fund of the State.

“The proceeds of public improvement bonds and notes, including premium thereon, if any, may be used with any other monies made available by the General Assembly for funding the projects authorized by this section, including the proceeds of any other State bond issues, whether heretofore made available or that may be made available at the session of the General Assembly at which this section is ratified or any subsequent sessions. The proceeds of public improvement bonds and notes, including premium thereon, if any, shall be expended and disbursed under the direction and supervision of the Director of the Budget. The funds provided by this section shall be disbursed for the purposes provided in this section upon warrants drawn on the State Treasurer by the State Controller, which warrants shall not be drawn until requisition has been approved by the Director of the Budget and which requisition shall be approved only after full compliance with the State Budget Act, Chapter 143C of the General Statutes.

“(2) Tracking of bond proceeds. — The State Treasurer or the State Treasurer’s designee is hereby authorized and directed to set up a comprehensive system of tracking the proceeds of the public improvement bonds and notes, including premium thereon, if any, to the extent necessary to enable the State Treasurer or the State Treasurer’s designee to properly account for the use of such proceeds for compliance with applicable requirements of the federal tax law or otherwise. All recipients of such proceeds shall comply with any tracking system implemented by the State Treasurer or the State Treasurer’s designee for this purpose. The State Treasurer may withhold such proceeds from any State agency or department not complying with this subdivision.

“(3) Costs. — Allocations to the costs of a capital improvement or undertaking in each case may include allocations to pay the costs set forth in sub-subdivisions c. through g. of subdivision (2) of subsection (d) of this section in connection with the issuance of bonds for that capital improvement or undertaking.

“

SECTION 1(i).

Election. — The question of the issuance of the bonds authorized by this section shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the State at the time of the election in 2016 when voters of this State are given an opportunity to express their preference for the person to be the presidential candidate of their political party. Any other primary, election, or referendum validly called or scheduled by law at the time the election on the bond question provided for in this subsection is held may be held as called or scheduled. Notice of the election shall be given in the manner and at the times required by
G.S. 163-33(8). The election and the registration of voters therefor shall be held under and in accordance with the general laws of the State. Absentee ballots shall be authorized in the election and shall be available 50 days prior to the date on which the election is to be held.

“Ballots, voting systems authorized by Article 14A of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, or both may be used in accordance with rules prescribed by the State Board of Elections. The bond question to be used in the ballots or voting systems shall be in substantially the following form:

“[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.5, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

§ 142-2.
Title of act and year of enactment recited in bonds.

In every bond or certificate of debt issued by the State, and in the body thereof, shall be set forth the title of the act, with the year of its enactment, under the authority of which the same may be issued; or reference shall be made thereto by the number of the Chapter, and the year of the legislative session.

History.

1850, c. 90, s. 6; R.C., c. 90, s. 6; Code, s. 3566; Rev., s. 5023; C.S., s. 7402.